Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-166
Otoe.

The county of Otoe is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township seven, north, range nine, east; thence east to the middle of the main channel of the Missouri River as established by the original government survey of 1857; thence up said channel until it intersects the southern boundary of the State of Iowa; thence continuing north along the eastern boundary line of the State of Nebraska as established by the Iowa-Nebraska Boundary Compact of 1943 until said boundary line intersects the dividing line between townships nine and ten; thence west to the northwest corner of township nine, north, range nine, east; and thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 39, p. 219;

R.S.1913, § 881;

C.S.1922, § 783;

C.S.1929, § 25-170;

R.S.1943, § 22-166;

Laws 1955, c. 65, § 5, p. 213.